Florida, session 2026, HB625.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (2) of section 43.16, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
43.16 Justice Administrative Commission; membership,
powers and duties.—
(2) Members of the Justice Administrative Commission shall
serve for a period of 2 years, with the terms of each dating
from July 1, 1985, except that initially, one state attorney
member and one public defender member shall each serve a 1-year
term. Members shall be selected in the following manner:
(a) Three Two state attorneys, to be appointed by the
president of the Florida Prosecuting Attorneys Association.
(b) Two public defenders, to be appointed by the president
of the Florida Public Defender Association.
(c) One criminal defense attorney who is not employed by
the government and who has contracted with the commission to
provide services pursuant to s. 27.40 within the 5 years
preceding his or her appointment, to be appointed by the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb625 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 625, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
president of The Florida Bar Board of Governors.
(d) One judge, or senior judge serving on a court, to be
appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb625 -04-er